Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.68.020

Commencement by registered voter—Causes for.

Any of the following causes may be asserted by a registered voter to challenge the right to assume office of a candidate declared elected to that office, to challenge the right of a candidate to appear on the general election ballot after a primary, or to challenge certification of the result of an election on any measure:

(1) For misconduct on the part of any election officer involved therein;

(2) Because the person whose right is being contested was not, at the time the person was declared elected, eligible to that office;

(3) Because the person whose right is being contested was, previous to the election, convicted of a felony by a court of competent jurisdiction, the conviction not having been reversed nor the person's civil rights restored after the conviction;

(4) Because the person whose right is being contested gave a bribe or reward to a voter or to an election officer for the purpose of procuring the election, or offered to do so;

(5) On account of illegal votes.

(a) Illegal votes include but are not limited to the following:

(i) More than one vote cast by a single voter;

(ii) A vote cast by a person disqualified under Article VI, section 3 of the state Constitution.

(b) Illegal votes do not include votes cast by improperly registered voters who were not properly challenged under RCW 29A.08.810 and 29A.08.820.

All election contests must proceed under RCW 29A.68.011 or 29A.68.013.

[ 2016 c 130 s 3; 2013 c 11 s 72; 2011 c 10 s 64; 2007 c 374 s 4; 2003 c 111 s 1702; 1983 1st ex.s. c 30 s 6; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 101; 1965 c 9 s 29.65.010. Prior: 1959 c 329 s 26; prior: (i) Code 1881 s 3105; 1865 p 42 s 1; RRS s 5366. (ii) Code 1881 s 3109; 1865 p 43 s 5; RRS s 5370. Formerly RCW 29.65.010.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.

Civil rights

loss of: State Constitution Art. 6 s 3, RCW 29A.08.520.

restoration of: RCW 9.92.066, 9.94A.637, 9.94A.885, 9.95.260, chapter 9.96 RCW.